Washington statutes.
RCW 43.210.040

Powers and duties.

(1) The small business export finance assistance center formed under RCW 43.210.020 and 43.210.030 has the powers granted under chapter 24.03A RCW. In exercising such powers, the center may:

(a) Solicit and accept grants, contributions, and any other financial assistance from the federal government, federal agencies, and any other sources to carry out its purposes;

(b) Make loans or provide loan guarantees on loans made by financial institutions to Washington businesses with annual sales of two hundred million dollars or less for the purpose of financing exports of goods or services by those businesses to buyers in foreign countries and for the purpose of financing business growth to accommodate increased export sales. Loans or loan guarantees made under the authority of this section may only be considered upon a financial institution's assurance that such loan or loan guarantee is otherwise not available;

(c) Provide assistance to businesses with annual sales of two hundred million dollars or less in obtaining loans and guarantees of loans made by financial institutions for the purpose of financing export of goods or services from the state of Washington;

(d) Provide export finance and risk mitigation counseling to Washington exporters with annual sales of two hundred million dollars or less, provided that such counseling is not practicably available from a Washington for-profit business. For such counseling, the center may charge reasonable fees as it determines are necessary;

(e) Provide assistance in obtaining export credit insurance or alternate forms of foreign risk mitigation to facilitate the export of goods and services from the state of Washington;

(f) Be available as a teaching resource to both public and private sponsors of workshops and programs relating to the financing and risk mitigation aspects of exporting products and services from the state of Washington;

(g) Develop a comprehensive inventory of export-financing resources, both public and private, including information on resource applicability to specific countries and payment terms;

(h) Contract with the federal government and its agencies to become a program administrator for federally provided loan guarantee and export credit insurance programs; and

(i) Take whatever action may be necessary to accomplish the purposes set forth in this chapter.

(2) The center may not use any Washington state funds or funds which come from the public treasury of the state of Washington to make loans or to make any payment under a loan guarantee agreement. Under no circumstances may the center use any funds received under RCW 43.210.050 to make or assist in making any loan or to pay or assist in paying any amount under a loan guarantee agreement. Debts of the center shall be center debts only and may be satisfied only from the resources of the center. The state of Washington shall not in any way be liable for such debts.

(3) The small business export finance assistance center shall make every effort to seek nonstate funds for its continued operation.

(4) The small business export finance assistance center may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the small business export finance assistance center and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5225; 2010 c 166 s 1; 1998 c 109 s 3; 1987 c 505 s 43; 1985 c 231 s 4; 1983 1st ex.s. c 20 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.